Massachusetts, session 194th, H2935.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Group 2 of paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the General 
Laws, as most recently amended by chapter 139 of the acts of 2012, is hereby further amended 
by inserting after the words “employees of the trial court of the commonwealth who hold the 
position of chief probation officer, assistant chief probation officer, probation officer in charge or 
probation officer, chief court officer, assistant chief court officer or court officer” the following 
words:- employees holding the title of victim witness advocate as defined by section 1 of chapter 
258B who have been employed in such capacity for ten years or more;